Hawaii, session 2026, HB1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§343-     Time limit on validity of certain determinations.  (a)  Any finding of no significant impact of a final environmental assessment or acceptance of a final environmental impact statement for a proposed action shall be valid until the latter of: (1)       years after the finding or acceptance; or (2)  If any judicial proceeding is initiated pursuant to section 343-7,      years after any court order issuing a finding of no significant impact of a final environmental assessment or acceptance of a final environmental impact statement for the proposed action. (b) Upon the expiration of validity of a finding of no significant impact of a final environmental assessment or acceptance of a final environmental impact statement for a proposed action pursuant to subsection (a), an agency or applicant shall commence a new environmental review process in accordance with this chapter to determine whether the proposed action may proceed." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________